Hawaii statutes.
[§321-1.7] Public health nursing services
program. (a) There is established within the department of health a
public health nursing services program. At the discretion of the director of
health, the program may provide services, including but not limited to the following:

(1) Mobilizing the department's nursing resources and
responding to catastrophic and traumatic emergency events, including natural
disasters and biologic outbreaks or exposures;

(2) Responding to communicable disease, epidemic, and
other public health disease outbreaks;

(3) Providing care coordination services to the most
vulnerable populations of special needs infants, toddlers, and children with
complex medical conditions, including medically fragile children, as well as
the elderly and other populations who have difficulty accessing the health care
system;

(4) Collaborating with the department of education
and the Hawaii chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics in providing
school health services to address the medical and health conditions of public
school students that affect their learning;

(5) Developing collaborative partnerships with
individuals, families, communities, and providers to improve the health of
families and communities through the assessment of community health needs, the
setting of priorities, and policy development;

(6) Collecting and evaluating data to determine
family and community health needs for nursing and health service delivery
changes to enhance the quality of life for families; and

(7) Providing other health care related services as
determined appropriate based on community health needs.

(b) Provision of services by the public health
nursing services program shall be limited by and subject to the availability of
funds. [L 2004, c 173, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next